Massachusetts, session 194th, S1638.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 6 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 222 the 
following section:-  
Section 223. There is hereby established a special commission on endometriosis located 
within, but not subject to the control of, the executive office of health and human services. The 
commission shall work to study, raise awareness, and make policy recommendations relative to 
endometriosis.   
The commission shall consist of: 2 persons appointed by the senate president; 1 person 
appointed by the senate minority leader; 2 persons appointed by the speaker of the house of 
representatives; 1 person appointed by the house of representatives minority leader; the secretary 
of the executive office of health and human services, or a designee; the commissioner of the 
department of public health, or a designee; the commissioner of insurance, or a designee; 2 
persons to be appointed by the governor; 1 person appointed by AllPaths Family Building who 

of 3 13 has endometriosis or has a close family member with endometriosis; 1 person appointed by the 
Center for Endometriosis Care of Mount Auburn Hospital; 1 person appointed by the 
Endometriosis Summit who has endometriosis or has a close family member with endometriosis; 
3 persons appointed by the Massachusetts Medical Society, including at least 1 
obstetrician/gynecologist and at least 1 expert in desmoid tumors; and 1 person appointed by the 
New England Fertility Society. The senate president and the speaker of the house of 
representatives shall each designate a co-chair from their respective appointees.  
The commission shall investigate and work to raise awareness and improve the care of 
endometriosis, including, but not limited to: (i) an assessment of the availability of current 
research and provider education about endometriosis, desmoid tumors, and other conditions that 
occur more frequently in persons with endometriosis; (ii) provide assistance to the department of 
public health, other state agencies and organizations in the development of professional and 
public educational materials and programs on endometriosis; (iii) provide assistance to the 
department of public health, other state agencies and organizations relative to applications for 
federal funding to support efforts consistent with the mission and purpose of the commission; 
and (iv) any other matters that the commission considers relevant to the fulfillment of its mission 
and purpose.  
The commission shall provide guidance and advice to the governor, the general court, 
and the secretary of health and human services relative to current research on endometriosis 
including, but not limited to, best and promising practices in the diagnosis and treatment of 
endometriosis and recommend policies, including legislation, to improve public awareness of 
and access to care for endometriosis. The special commission may conduct public hearings, 
forums or meetings to gather information and to raise awareness of endometriosis.  

of 3 36  The commission shall submit a report of its study and recommendations to the clerks of 
the house of representatives and the senate and the senate and house committees on ways and 
means not later than December 31, 2026.